Massachusetts, session 194th, H3443.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Construction and development activity related to redevelopment by the
developer selected by the Boston Planning & Development Agency of subsidized affordable
housing, including space for a branch library to be procured by the Boston Public Library, to be
built on BPDA-owned land under a ground lease, or any part thereof, shall not be subject to any
general or special law related to the procurement and award of contracts for the planning, design,
construction management, construction, reconstruction, installation, demolition, maintenance, or
repair of buildings by a public agency, but shall be subject to sections 26 to 27H, inclusive, of
chapter 149 of the Generals Laws. Contracts for the construction, reconstruction, alteration,
remodeling, or repair of any publicly owned public works that service this project and would
otherwise be subject to section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws shall be subject to said
section 39M if the redevelopment of the project is funded in part by state or federal government
of 2

low-income housing tax credit, grant, or loan, or pursuant to the issuance of tax-exempt bonds
authorized by general law. A conveyance of the project, whether by leasehold or fee estate, to an
urban redevelopment corporation organized under chapter 121A of the General Laws or to a
nonprofit state and federally tax-exempt corporation organized for the purpose of revitalizing the
project, shall be subject to chapter 30B of the General Laws to the extent that the project is
conveyed to an entity that is not owned, controlled, or managed by the Boston Public Library on
the date of the conveyance.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2